Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-4] Hospital
sustainability program special fund. [Section repealed December 31,
2017. L 2016, c 60, §3.] (a) There is created in the state treasury
the hospital sustainability program special fund to be administered by the
department into which shall be deposited all moneys collected under this
chapter.

(b) Moneys in the hospital sustainability
program special fund shall consist of:

(1) All revenue received by the department from the
hospital sustainability fee;

(2) All federal medicaid funds received by the
department as a result of matching expenditures made with the hospital
sustainability fee;

(3) Any interest or penalties levied in conjunction
with the administration of this chapter; and

(4) Any designated appropriations, federal funds,
donations, gifts, or moneys from any other sources.

(c) Moneys in the hospital sustainability
program special fund shall be used exclusively as follows:

(1) No less than eighty-eight per cent of the revenue
from the hospital sustainability fee shall be used for one or more of the
following:

(A) Match federal medicaid funds, with the
combined total to be used to enhance capitated rates to medicaid managed care
health plans for the sole purpose of increasing medicaid payments to private
hospitals;

(B) Match federal medicaid funds for Hawaii's
medicaid disproportionate share hospital allotment as authorized by current
federal law for private hospitals;

(C) Match federal medicaid funds for a
private hospital upper payment limit pool; or

(D) Match federal medicaid funds with the
combined total to be used to enhance capitated rates to medicaid managed care
health plans for the purpose of increasing medicaid payments to private
hospitals through a quality incentive pool;

(2) Twelve per cent of the moneys in the hospital
sustainability program special fund may be used by the department for other
departmental purposes; and

(3) Any money remaining in the hospital
sustainability program special fund six months after the repeal of this
chapter, shall be distributed to hospitals within thirty days in the same
proportions as received from the hospitals.

(d) The department shall utilize federal funds
derived from state hospital certified expenditures to make supplemental
payments to state hospitals and is authorized to receive intergovernmental
transfers from the state hospitals to support direct supplemental payments and increased
capitation rates to health plans for the benefit of the state hospitals.
During any period in which the hospital sustainability fee is in effect,
certified expenditures of state hospitals shall not be used to make or support
direct payments to private hospitals. [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013,
c 141, pt of §1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §2; am L 2015, c 70, §§1(2), 2; am L
2016, c 60, §2(2)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next